Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3519
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-3501 to 71-3520 shall be known and may be cited as the Radiation Control Act.

Laws 1963, c. 406, § 20, p. 1306;

Laws 1987, LB 390, § 22;

Laws 2001, LB 668, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 78;

Laws 2005, LB 453, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 108;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1216;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 29.